test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_ed_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    acceeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: asam
    acceeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aca
    acceeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: asan
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anam
    apseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: apsam
    apteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aptam
    apteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: optim
    cicceeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cisám
    cicceđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cicám
    cilkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cilhám
    cirgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cirgám
    cirgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cirgá
    cirkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cirhám
    civkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciivhám
    ciŋkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciŋkám
    huhkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huhkám
    huikkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huuihám
    hurgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hurgám
    ihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ivtám
    itteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iđám
    jalkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jalham
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođám
    juhkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juhkám
    julkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: julhám
    jurdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurdám
    justeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: justám
    juškeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juškám
    kacceđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kasam
    kahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavam
    kalmeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalmam
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalvam
    kardeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kardam
    karreeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kara
    karveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: karvam
    kašneđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kašnam
    kašneđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kašna
    kicceeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kicá
    kihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiivtám
    kijtteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiijtám
    kildeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kildám
    kincceđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kincám
    kirdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kirdám
    kiskeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiská
    kocceeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kosám
    koddeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kodám
    koldeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koldám
    kolgâvetteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leđe
    kopseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kopsám
    kođđeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kođám
    kođđeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kođá
    kurdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kurdám
    labdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: labdam
    lahteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lahtam
    lipčeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lipčám
    livkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liivhám
    loggeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: logám
    loskeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loskám
    luvveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvám
    mahkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mahkam
    mavređ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mavram
    mađđeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mađam
    mokseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moovsám
    murdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: murdám
    mutteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mutám
    mušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštám
    nabdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nabdam
    nargeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nargam
    niddeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nidám
    nijtteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niijtám
    nisteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nistám
    nivkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nivkká
    njaddeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njadda
    njaldeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaldam
    njađđeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njađam
    njibžeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njibžám
    njivkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njivhám
    njizzeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njizám
    njulččeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njulččá
    nurdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurdám
    olleeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: olám
    pahheeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pavam
    paldeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paldam
    panneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: panam
    panneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pana
    pardeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pardam
    passeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pasam
    passeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pasa
    pasteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pastam
    paškeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paškam
    paččeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pajam
    pađđeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pađam
    pihteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piivtám
    pilleeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pilá
    pitteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piđám
    pišteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pištám
    piđđeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piđám
    pohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poovtám
    pođgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pođgám
    poŋkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poŋkám
    poŋkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poŋkká
    puitteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puittá
    purcceđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: purcceh
    pušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puštám
    rijdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riijdám
    ripseđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ripseh
    riškeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riškám
    saddeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sadam
    saijeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajam
    salkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: salham
    savveeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sava
    savŋeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: savŋam
    sikkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sihám
    sildeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sildám
    sirdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sirdám
    siävŋuditteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävŋuditám
    siävŋuditteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävŋudit
    skilkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skilkká
    skulččeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skulččá
    snuđgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuđgám
    sohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soovtám
    sohteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sahta
    sohčeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sohčá
    soicceđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soiccá
    sparkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sparkka
    spiđgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spiđgám
    stircceđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stirccá
    stulččeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stulčám
    suitteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuitám
    suldeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suldám
    susteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sustám
    suvneđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuvnám
    suđđeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suđám
    sámáiditteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sámáiditám
    tipteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiptám
    tipteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iberdiđ
    tipteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oskođ
    tiškeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiškám
    toideđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tooidám
    toijeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tojám
    tuvdeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuvdám
    ušteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uštám
    uđđâsistanneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uđđâsistanam
    vaijeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vajam
    vaijeeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaja
    vantteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vantam
    vantteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vantta
    vardeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vardam
    vardeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: varda
    vilššeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vilšám
    visteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vistám
    časkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: časkam
    časkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čalme
    časkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: časka
    šilleeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šilám
    čipteđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiptám
    škaŋkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: škaŋkam
    šloŋkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šloŋkám
    šluvgeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šluuvgám
